sl-SI: Območje uporabe lubrikanta za trobila: Pluta in spoji; Povezava tipk/ročic; Vrat za ustnik; Večnamensko; Batni ventili; Rotacijski ventili; Mast za poteg (splošno); Poteg za pozavno; Poteg(i) za uglaševanje; Ležaji / osi ventila; Drugo
hu: Sárgaréz kenőanyag alkalmazási területe: Parafák és illesztések; Billentyű-/karmechanika; Fúvókabefogó; Többcélú; Dugattyús szelepek; Forgószelepek; Tolócsőzsír (általános); Harsona tolócsöve; Hangolócső (hangolócsövek); Szelepcsapágyak/orsók; Egyéb
el: Περιοχή εφαρμογής λιπαντικού για ορειχάλκινα πνευστά όργανα: Φελλοί και ενώσεις; Σύνδεση κλειδιού/μοχλού; Υποδοχή επιστομίου; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Εμβολοφόρες βαλβίδες; Περιστροφικές βαλβίδες; Γράσο ολκού (γενικής χρήσης); Ολκός τρομπονιού; Ολκός/-οί κουρδίσματος; Ρουλεμάν/άξονες βαλβίδων; Άλλο
lt-LT: Varinio pučiamojo instrumento lubrikanto naudojimo sritis: Kamščiai ir jungtys; Klavišų / svirčių jungtys; Pūstuko lizdas; Daugiafunkcis; Stūmokliniai vožtuvai; Sukamieji vožtuvai; Slankiklių tepalas (bendrasis); Trombono kulisa; Derinimo slankiklis (-iai); Vožtuvų guoliai / ašys; Kita
vi: Vị trí tra dầu bôi trơn nhạc cụ bộ đồng: Bấc & khớp nối; Khớp nối phím/cần gạt; Ống nhận búp kèn; Đa năng; Van pít-tông; Van xoay; Mỡ bôi trơn ống trượt (chung); Ống trượt kèn trombone; Ống trượt điều âm; Vòng bi/trục van; Khác
ro-RO: Zona de aplicare a lubrifiantului pentru alamă: Plute și îmbinări; Mecanism cu clapă/pârghie; Receptor muștiuc; Multifuncțional; Supape cu piston; Supape rotative; Unsoare pentru culisă (uz general); Culisă de trombon; Culisă(e) de acordaj; Rulmenți/axe pentru supape; Altele
pl: Obszar zastosowania środka smarującego do instrumentu dętego blaszanego: Korki i łączenia; Mechanizm klap/dźwigni; Gniazdo ustnika; Wielofunkcyjne; Wentyle tłokowe; Wentyle obrotowe; Smar do suwaków i krąglików (ogólny); Suwak puzonu; Krąglik(i) strojeniowy(e); Łożyska/ośki wentyli; Inne
fr: Zone d'application du lubrifiant pour laiton: Lièges et assemblages; Tringlerie de clés/leviers; Récepteur d’embouchure; Multi-usage; Pistons; Barillets; Graisse pour coulisse (générale); Coulisse de trombone; Coulisse(s) d’accord; Roulements/axes de barillet; Autre
nl: Toepassingsgebied voor smeermiddel voor koperblaasinstrumenten: Kurken en verbindingen; Klep-/hendelmechanisme; Mondstukhouder; Multifunctioneel; Pistonventielen; Cilinderventielen; Schuifvet (algemeen); Tromboneschuif; Stemschuif (-schuiven); Ventiellagers/-assen; Overig
tr: Bakır nefesli çalgı yağlayıcısı uygulama alanı: Mantarlar ve ek yerleri; Tuş/kaldıraç bağlantısı; Ağızlık yuvası; Çok amaçlı; Piston valfler; Döner valfler; Sürgü gresi (genel); Trombon sürgüsü; Akort sürgüsü(leri); Piston yatakları/milleri; Diğer
zh-TW: 銅管潤滑劑適用區域: 軟木塞與接頭; 按鍵/槓桿連桿; 吹嘴接收管; 多用途; 活塞; 轉閥; 伸縮管潤滑脂 (一般); 長號伸縮管; 調音管; 活塞軸承/轉軸; 其他
de: Anwendungsbereich für Öl für Blechblasinstrumente: Korken & Verbindungen; Klappen-/Hebelmechanik; Mundstückaufnahme; Mehrzweck; Pumpventile; Drehventile; Zugfett (Allgemein); Posaunenzug; Stimmzug; Ventillager/-spindeln; Sonstiges
da: Anvendelsesområder for messingsmøremiddel: Kork og samlinger; Klappe-/mekanikforbindelse; Mundstykkemodtager; Multifunktionel; Stempelventiler; Rotorventiler; Træksmørelse (generelt); Basuntræk; Stemmetræk; Ventillejer/spindler; Andet
nb: Påføringsområde for messingsmøremiddel: Korker og skjøter; Klaffe-/spakekobling; Munnstykkefeste; Flerbruks; Stempelventiler; Rotorventiler; Bøylefett (generelt); Trombonetrekk; Stemmebøyle(r); Ventillagre/-spindler; Annet
ja: 真鍮潤滑剤適用エリア: コルク＆ジョイント; キー/レバーリンケージ; マウスピースレシーバー; 多目的; ピストンバルブ; ロータリーバルブ; スライドグリス (一般); トロンボーンスライド; チューニングスライド; バルブベアリング/スピンドル; その他
cs: Oblast použití maziva na mosaz: Korky a spoje; Spoje klapek/pák; Trubička pro nátrubek; Víceúčelové; Pístové ventily; Cylindrické ventily; Mazivo na tahy (obecně); Snížec pozounu; Ladicí tahy; Ložiska/osy ventilů; Jiné
sv: Applikationsområde för smörjmedel för mässing: Korkar och skarvar; Klaff-/mekaniklänkage; Munstyckesfäste; Allround; Pumpventiler; Cylinderventiler; Bygelfett (allmänt); Trombondrag; Stämbygel/stämbyglar; Ventillager/spindlar; Övrigt
pt-BR: Área de aplicação do lubrificante para metal: Cortiças e encaixes; Articulação de chave/alavanca; Receptor do bocal; Multiuso; Válvulas de pisto; Válvulas rotativas; Graxa para pompa (geral); Vara de trombone; Pompa(s) de afinação; Rolamentos/eixos da válvula; Outros
bg-BG: Зона на приложение на смазка за медни музикални инструменти: Коркове и сглобки; Клавишни/лостови механизми; Гнездо за мундщук; Многоцелево; Бутални вентили; Роторни вентили; Смазка за цуг (обща); Цуг за тромбон; Настройващи цугове; Лагери/оси на вентили; Друго
zh-CN: 铜管乐器润滑剂应用范围: 软木与接头; 键/连杆机构; 号嘴接收器; 多用途; 活塞阀; 转阀; 调音管润滑脂（通用）; 长号拉管; 调音管; 阀轴承/轴; 其他
ru: Область применения смазки: Пробки и соединения; Клапанная/рычажная система; Приемник мундштука; Многоцелевая; Помповые клапаны; Вентильные клапаны; Смазка для кулисы (общая); Кулиса тромбона; Настроечные кроны; Подшипники/оси клапанов; Другое
it: Area di applicazione del lubrificante per ottoni: Sugheri e giunti; Collegamento chiavi/leve; Ricevitore del bocchino; Multiuso; Valvole a pistone; Valvole a cilindro; Grasso per pompe (generale); Coulisse per trombone; Pompa/e di intonazione; Cuscinetti/perni delle valvole; Altro
hr-HR: Područje primjene maziva za limena puhaća glazbala: Pluta i spojevi; Spojevi tipki/poluga; Prihvatnik usnika; Višenamjensko; Klipni ventili; Rotacijski ventili; Mast za povlačak (općenito); Trombonski povlačak; Povlačak (povlačci) za ugađanje; Ležajevi/osovine ventila; Ostalo
sk-SK: Oblasť použitia lubrikantu pri plechových dychových nástrojoch: Korkové časti a spoje; Kĺby klapiek/páčok; Puzdro nátrubku; Viacúčelové; Piestové ventily; Rotačné ventily; Mazivo na znižce (všeobecné); Znižec pozauny; Ladiace znižce; Ložiská/čapy ventilov; Iné
en: Brass lubricant application area: Corks & joints; Key/lever linkage; Mouthpiece receiver; Multi-purpose; Piston valves; Rotary valves; Slide grease (general); Trombone slide; Tuning slide(s); Valve bearings/spindles; Other
pt-PT: Área de aplicação do lubrificante para instrumentos de sopro: Cortiças e juntas; Ligação de chave/alavanca; Recetor de bocal; Multiusos; Válvulas de pistão; Válvulas rotativas; Massa para varas (geral); Vara de trombone; Vara(s) de afinação; Rolamentos/eixos de válvulas; Outro
ko: 금관악기 윤활유 도포 부위: 코르크 및 조인트; 키/레버 링키지; 마우스피스 리시버; 다목적; 피스톤 밸브; 로터리 밸브; 슬라이드 그리스(일반); 트롬본 슬라이드; 튜닝 슬라이드; 밸브 베어링/스핀들; 기타
es: Área de aplicación de lubricante para latón: Corchos y uniones; Varillaje de llaves/palancas; Receptor de boquilla; Multiuso; Pistones; Cilindros; Grasa para bombas (general); Vara de trombón; Bomba(s) de afinación; Cojinetes/ejes de cilindro; Otro
th: บริเวณที่ใช้งานน้ำมันหล่อลื่นสำหรับเครื่องดนตรีทองเหลือง: ไม้ก๊อกและข้อต่อ; ข้อต่อคีย์/คันโยก; ส่วนรับปากเป่า; อเนกประสงค์; ลูกสูบวาล์ว; โรตารีวาล์ว; จาระบีทาสไลด์ (ทั่วไป); สไลด์ทรอมโบน; สไลด์เทียบเสียง; ลูกปืนวาล์ว/แกนหมุน; อื่นๆ
fi: Vaskipuhaltimen voiteluaineen käyttöalue: Korkit ja liitokset; Koskettimiston/vivuston nivel; Suukappaleen vastaanotin; Monikäyttöinen; Mäntäventtiilit; Roottoriventtiilit; Luistirasva (yleinen); Pasuunan vetoputki; Viritysputki/viritysputket; Venttiilien laakerit/akselit; Muu